District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0688.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the "Student Health Care Amendment Act of 2026".
Sec. 2. The Student Health Care Act of 1985, effective December 3, 1985 (D.C. Law 6-
66; D.C. Official Code§ 38-601 et seq.), is amended as follows:
(a) Section 2 (D.C. Official Code§ 38-601) is amended as follows:
(1) A new paragraph (lA) is added to read as follows:
"(IA) "Certificate of health" means a form prescribed by the Mayor to report
infonnation on a student's physical health.".
(2) A new paragraph (3A) is added to read as follows:


“(3A) “Certificate of oral health” means a form prescribed by the Mayor to report
on a student’s oral health.”.
(b) Section 3 (D.C. Official Code § 38-602) is amended as follows:
(1) The section heading is amended to read as follows:
“Sec. 3. Examination requirements; certificates of health and oral health.”.
(2) Subsection (a) is amended to read as follows:
“(a)(1) Except as provided in section 4, each student attending prekindergarten through
grade 12 in a public, public charter, private, or independent school in the District shall furnish the
school annually with:
“(A) A certificate of health completed and signed by a physician or
advanced practice nurse who has examined the student during the 12-month period immediately
preceding the 1st day of the school year or the date of the student’s enrollment in the school,
whichever occurs later; and
“(B) A certificate of oral health completed and signed by a dentist who has
examined the student during the 12-month period immediately preceding the 1st day of the
school year or the date of the student’s enrollment in the school, whichever occurs later.
“(2) The examinations performed under paragraph (1) of this subsection shall
cover all items applicable to the student required by the certificate of health or certificate of oral
health.”.
(3) Subsection (a-1) is amended by striking the phrase “pre-kindergarten,
kindergarten or first grade in a public or private school in the District, the student shall furnish
the school with a certificate of testing for lead poisoning” and inserting the phrase


“prekindergarten, kindergarten or first grade in a public or private school in the District, the
student shall furnish the school with a certificate of health” in its place.
(4) Subsection (b) is repealed.
(5) Subsection (c) is amended to read as follows:
“(c) The Mayor shall develop standard forms for the certificate of health and the
certificate of oral health, which shall require the reporting of such information as the Mayor
considers appropriate and may vary by age, grade level, or such other factors as the Mayor
considers appropriate; provided, that the certificate of health shall include a section requiring the
reporting of information on the student’s blood lead levels at specific ages or grade levels. The
Mayor shall post the forms on the website of the Department of Health.”.
Sec. 3. The Student Access to Treatment Act of 2007, effective February 2, 2008 (D.C.
Law 17-107; D.C. Official Code § 38-651.01 et seq.), is amended as follows:
(a) Section 2 (D.C. Official Code § 38-651.01) is amended as follows:
(1) Paragraph (1) is repealed.
(2) Paragraph (5D) is amended as follows:
(A) Subparagraph (B) is amended by striking the phrase “; and” and
inserting a semicolon in its place.
(B) A new subparagraph (B-i) is added to read as follows:
“(B-i) Epinephrine; and”.
(3) Paragraphs (6) and (7) are repealed.
(b) Section 5a (D.C. Official Code § 38-651.04a) is repealed.
(c) Section 7(h) (D.C. Official Code § 38-651.06(h)) is repealed.


(d) Section 10(a) (D.C. Official Code § 38-651.09(a)) is amended by striking the phrase
“Except as provided in section 5a, a school” and inserting the phrase “A school” in its place.
Sec. 4. (a) Title III of the Community Health Omnibus Amendment Act of 2018, effective
April 11, 2019 (D.C. Law 22-290; D.C. Official Code § 7-858.01 et seq.), is amended as follows:
(1) Section 301(1A) (D.C. Official Code § 7-858.01(1A)) is repealed.
(2) Sections 305 and 306 (D.C. Official Code §§ 7-858.05; 7-858.06) are
repealed.
(b) Section 2(f)(69) of the Confirmation Act of 1978, effective March 3, 1979 (D.C. Law
2-142; D.C. Official Code § 1-523.01(f)(69)), is repealed.
Sec. 4. Conforming amendments.
(a) Section 2 of the Poison Control Center Designation Act of 2020, effective June 24,
2020 (D.C. Law 23-120; D.C. Official Code § 7-731, note), is amended by striking the phrase
“The National Capital Poison Center” and inserting the phrase “The Maryland Poison Center of
the University of Maryland School of Pharmacy” in its place.
(b) Section 4a(a)(5) of the Pesticide Operations Act of 1977, effective June 5, 2008 (D.C.
Law 17-168; D.C. Official Code § 8-403.01(a)(5) is amended by striking the phrase “National
Capital Poison Control Center” and inserting the phrase “The Maryland Poison Center of the
University of Maryland School of Pharmacy” in its place.
100 Sec. 5. Fiscal impact statement.
101 The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
102 impact a statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
103 approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
104 Sec. 6. Effective date.


105 This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
106 Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), a 30-day period of congressional review as
107 provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
108 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(l)), and publication in the District of
109 Columbia Register.


GOVERNMENT OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA
OFFICE OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL
BRIAN L. SCHWALB PRIVILEGED AND CONFIDENTIAL
ATTORNEY GENERAL ATTORNEY-CLIENT COMMUNICATION
LEGAL COUNSEL DIVISION
MEMORANDUM
TO: Tomás Talamante
Director
Office of Policy and Legislative Affairs
FROM: Adele El-Khouri
Deputy Attorney General
Legal Counsel Division
DATE: February 4, 2026
SUBJECT: Legal Sufficiency Review of Draft Legislation the “Student Health Care Amendment
Act of 2026” (AE-26-207)
_____________________________________________________________________________________
This is to Certify that
the Office of the Attorney General has reviewed the
above-referenced legislation and found it to be legally sufficient. If you have any questions in this
regard, please do not hesitate to call me at (202) 262-6402.
_________________________________
Adele El-Khouri


Government of the District of Columbia
Office of the Chief Financial Officer
Glen Lee
Chief Financial Officer
MEMORANDUM
TO: The Honorable Phil Mendelson
Chairman, Council of the District of Columbia
FROM: Glen Lee
Chief Financial Officer
DATE: January 15, 2026
SUBJECT: Fiscal Impact Statement – Student Health Care Amendment Act of 2026
REFERENCE: Draft Introduction as provided to the Office of Revenue Analysis on
December 22, 2025
Conclusion
Funds are sufficient in the fiscal year 2026 through fiscal year 2029 budget and financial plan to
implement the bill.
Background
The Epinephrine in Schools Program was expanded at the start of school year 2025-2026 to become
the Undesignated Emergency Medications (UEM) program. The UEM program provides schools with
albuterol, epinephrine, and glucagon at no cost to schools for use in emergency situations. The bill
updates1 the statutes related to the Epinephrine in Schools Program to transition the Program to the
UEM program. These updates include designating epinephrine as a UEM and specifying that DC
Health manages epinephrine distribution to schools.
The bill also redesignates2 the District’s poison control center as the Maryland Poison Center of the
University of Maryland School of Pharmacy. The current poison control center is designated as the
National Capital Poison Center.
By amending The Student Access to Treatment Act of 2007, effective February 2, 2008 (D.C. Law 17-107;
D.C. Official Code § 38-651.01 et seq.).
By amending the Poison Control Center Designation Act of 2020, effective June 24, 2020 (D.C. Law 23-120;
DCR 8981).
1350 Pennsylvania Avenue, NW, Suite 203, Washington, DC 20004 (202)727-2476
www.cfo.dc.gov

The Honorable Phil Mendelson
FIS: “Student Health Care Amendment Act of 2026,” Draft Introduction as provided to the Office of Revenue
Analysis on December 22, 2025
Finally, the bill makes3 several technical changes to the laws that relate to the annual submission of
Certificates of Health and Oral Health Assessment to enroll in school in the District.
Financial Plan Impact
Funds are sufficient in the fiscal year 2026 through fiscal year 2029 budget and financial plan to
implement the bill. DC Health already manages the UEM program, including the purchase and
distribution of undesignated epinephrine. Making technical changes to the law that pertains to the
annual submission of the Certificate of Health and Oral Health Assessment does not have a cost.
Likewise, redesigning the District’s poison control center does not have a cost to DC Health.
By amending The Student Health Care Act of 1985, effective December 2, 1985 (D.C. Law 6-66; D.C. Official
Code § 38-601 et seq.).
Page 2 of 2